District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0761.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Real Property Tax Sale Delay Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 47-1332 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “(c) and (d)” and inserting the
phrase “(c), (d), and (d-1)” in its place.
(b) A new subsection (d-1) is added to read as follows:
“(d-1)(1) The tax sale scheduled for July 15, 2026 shall be cancelled and no additional
tax sales shall be held until September 20, 2026 at the earliest.
“(2) The Chief Financial Officer shall mail notice of the cancellation to each
person who was mailed a notice of tax delinquency pursuant to § 47-1341(a) to the same address
to which the notice of tax delinquency was mailed.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of July 1, 2026.


Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).